Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.273

Identification of grant-eligible programs of study and other job training programs—Marketing.

For the purposes of identifying opportunity grant-eligible programs of study and other job training programs, the college board, in partnership with business, labor, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall:

(1) Identify high employer demand programs of study offered by qualified postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential, certificate, or degree;

(2) Identify job-specific training programs offered by qualified postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential, certificate, or degree in green industry occupations as established in chapter 14, Laws of 2008;

(3) Gain recognition of the credentials, certificates, and degrees by Washington's employers and labor organizations. The college board shall designate these recognized credentials, certificates, and degrees as "opportunity grant-eligible programs of study"; and

(4) Market the credentials, certificates, and degrees to potential students, businesses, and apprenticeship programs as a way for individuals to advance in their careers and to better meet the needs of industry.

[ 2009 c 353 s 2; 2008 c 14 s 10; 2007 c 277 s 201.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Scope of chapter 14, Laws of 2008—2008 c 14: See RCW 70A.45.005 and 70A.45.900.

Findings—Part headings not law—2007 c 277: See notes following RCW 28B.50.271.